Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2322
Homestead allowance.

A surviving spouse of a decedent who was domiciled in this state is entitled to a homestead allowance of seven thousand five hundred dollars for a decedent who dies before January 1, 2011, twenty thousand dollars for a decedent who dies on or after January 1, 2011, and before January 1, 2027, and twenty-five thousand dollars for a decedent who dies on or after January 1, 2027. If there is no surviving spouse, each minor child and each dependent child of the decedent is entitled to a homestead allowance amounting to the amount allowed for a surviving spouse divided by the number of minor and dependent children of the decedent. The homestead allowance is exempt from and has priority over all claims against the estate except for costs and expenses of administration. Homestead allowance is in addition to any share passing to the surviving spouse or minor or dependent child by the will of the decedent unless otherwise provided therein, by intestate succession or by way of elective share.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 44, UPC § 2-401;

Laws 1978, LB 650, § 4;

Laws 1980, LB 981, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB712, § 18;

Laws 2026, LB838, § 16.
July 18, 2026